Maine, session 132, LD1501.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 32 MRSA §561, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2019, c. 187, §2, is amended by
amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
The board may issue a nonrenewable temporary license, not to exceed 6 9 months, to
practice chiropractic to an applicant meeting all of the conditions of this subsection. The
temporary license must describe the place or setting where chiropractic services are
provided. An applicant failing to provide documentation of the requirements of this
subsection may not be granted a temporary license by the board. The board may by rule
establish other requirements for temporary licensure of chiropractic interns.
Page 1 - 132LR2029(02)